Utah statutes.
17-53-201.   General powers, duties, and functions of county legislative body.

(1)  Except as expressly provided otherwise in statute, each county legislative body shall exercise all legislative powers, have all legislative duties, and perform all legislative functions of the county, including those enumerated in this part.

(2)  A county legislative body may take any action required by law and necessary to the full discharge of its duties, even though the action is not expressly authorized by statute.



Amended by Chapter 241, 2001 General Session

